Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201649-1463.01
Late filing
fee; relief; reduction or waiver; when.

(1) A
person required to pay a late filing fee imposed under section 49-1449, 49-1458,
49-1463, 49-1467, 49-1469.08, 49-1478.01, or 49-1479.01 may apply to the commission
for relief. The commission by order may reduce the amount of a late filing
fee imposed and waive any or all of the interest due on the fee upon a showing
by such person that (a) the circumstances indicate no intent to file late,
(b) the person has not been required to pay late filing fees for two years
prior to the time the filing was due, (c) the late filing shows that less than five thousand dollars was raised, received,
or expended during the reporting period, and (d) a reduction of the late fees
and waiver of interest would not frustrate the purposes of the Nebraska Political
Accountability and Disclosure Act.

(2) A person required to pay a late filing fee imposed for
failure to file a statement of exemption under subsection (2) of section 49-1459
may apply to the commission for relief. The commission by order may reduce
or waive the late filing fee and waive any or all of the interest due on the
fee, and the person shall not be required to make a showing as provided by
subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1987, LB 480, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1263, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 420, § 19;

Laws 1998, LB 632, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 438, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 188, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 29.